North Carolina statutes. Chapter 159B. Joint Municipal Electric Power and Energy Act.
Article 2. Joint Agencies; Municipalities.

§ 159B-4.
Authority of municipalities to jointly cooperate.

In addition and supplemental to the powers otherwise conferred on municipalities by the laws of the State, and in order to accomplish the purposes of this Chapter and to obtain a supply of electric power and energy for the present and future needs of its inhabitants and customers, a municipality may jointly or severally plan, finance, develop, construct, reconstruct, acquire, improve, enlarge, better, own, operate and maintain a project situated within or without the State with one or more other municipalities or joint agencies created pursuant to this Chapter or, in the case of projects for the generation and transmission of electric power and energy, jointly with any persons, firms, associations or corporations, public or private, engaged in the generation, transmission or distribution of electric power and energy for resale within this State or any state contiguous to the State, and may make such plans and enter into such contracts in connection therewith, not inconsistent with the provisions of this Chapter, as are necessary or appropriate.

Prior to acquiring any generation project the governing board shall determine the needs of the municipality for power and energy based upon engineering studies and reports, and shall not acquire a project in excess of that amount of capacity and the energy associated therewith required to provide for its projected needs for power and energy from and after the date the project is estimated to be placed in normal continuous operation and for such reasonable period of time thereafter as shall be determined by the governing board and approved by the North Carolina Utilities Commission in a proceeding instituted pursuant to

G.S. 159B-24

. In determining the future power requirements of a municipality, there shall be taken into account the following:

The economies and efficiencies to be achieved in constructing on a large scale facilities for the generation of electric power and energy;

The municipality’s needs for reserve and peaking capacity and to meet obligations under pooling and reserve sharing agreements reasonably related to its needs for power and energy to which it is or may become a party;

The estimated useful life of such project;

The estimated time necessary for the planning, development, acquisition or construction of such project and the length of time required in advance to obtain, acquire or construct additional power supply; and

The reliability and availability of existing or alternative power supply sources and the cost of such existing or alternative power supply sources.

A determination by such governing board approved by the North Carolina Utilities Commission based upon appropriate findings of the foregoing matters shall be conclusive as to the quantity of the interest which a municipality may acquire in a generation project unless a party to the proceeding aggrieved by the determination of said Commission shall file notice of appeal pursuant to Article 5 of Chapter 62 of the General Statutes of North Carolina.

Nothing herein contained shall prevent a municipality or municipalities from undertaking studies to determine whether there is a need for a project or whether such project is feasible.

History.

1975, c. 186, s. 1; 1977, c. 385, s. 2; 1983, c. 574, s. 1; 1995, c. 412, s. 3.

§ 159B-5.
Joint ownership of a project; provisions of the contract or agreement with respect thereto.

Each municipality shall own a project in proportion to the amount of the money furnished or the value of property or other consideration supplied by it for the planning, development, acquisition or construction thereof, and shall be entitled to a percentage share of the output and capacity therefrom equal to such ownership proportion in such project.

Each municipality shall be severally liable for its own acts and not jointly or severally liable for the acts, omissions or obligations of others, and no money or property or other consideration supplied by any municipality shall be credited or otherwise applied to the account of any other municipality, nor shall the share of any municipality in a project be charged directly or indirectly with any debt or obligation of any other municipality or be subject to any lien as a result thereof. The acquisition of a project shall include, but shall not be limited to, the purchase or lease of an existing, completed project and the purchase of a project under construction. A municipality participating in the joint or several planning, financing, construction, reconstruction, acquisition, improvement, enlargement, betterment, ownership, operation or maintenance of any project under this Chapter may furnish money derived solely from the proceeds of bonds or from the ownership and operation of its electric system, or both, and provide property, both real and personal, services and other considerations.

Any contracts entered into by municipalities with respect to ownership in a project shall contain such terms, conditions and provisions, not inconsistent with the provisions hereof, as the governing boards of the municipalities shall deem to be in the interests of the municipalities. Any such contracts shall be ratified by resolution of the governing board of each municipality spread upon its minutes. Any such contracts shall include, but shall not be limited to, the following:

The purpose or purposes of the contract;

The duration of the contract;

The manner of appointing or employing the personnel necessary in connection with the project;

The method of financing the project, including the apportionment of costs and revenues;

Provisions specifying the ownership interests of the parties in real property used or useful in connection with the project, and the procedures for the disposition of such property when the contract expires, is terminated or when the project, for any reason, is abandoned, decommissioned or dismantled;

Provisions relating to alienation and prohibiting partition of a municipality’s interest in a project, which provisions shall not be subject to any provision of law restricting covenants against alienation or partition;

Provisions for the construction of a project, which may include the determination that one participating municipality or any person, firm or corporation may construct the project as agent for all the parties;

Provisions for the operation and maintenance of a project, which may include the determination that one participating municipality or any person, firm or corporation may operate and maintain the project as agent for all the parties;

Provisions for the creation of a committee of representatives of the participating municipalities with such powers of supervision of the construction and operation of the project as the contract, not inconsistent with the provisions of this Chapter, may provide;

Provisions that if one or more of the municipalities shall default in the performance or discharge of its or their obligations with respect to the project, the other party or parties may assume, pro rata or otherwise, the obligations of such defaulting party or parties and may succeed to such rights and interests of the defaulting party or parties in the project as may be agreed upon in the contract;

Methods for amending the contract;

Methods for terminating the contract; and

Any other necessary or proper matter.

For the purpose of paying its respective share of the cost of a project or projects, a municipality may issue its bonds as provided in this Chapter, and, notwithstanding the provisions of any other law to the contrary, may secure the payment of the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on such bonds by a lien and charge on all, or any portion of, the revenue derived or to be derived from the ownership and operation of its system or facilities for the generation, transmission, or distribution of electric power or energy or its interests in any project or projects, or a combination of such revenues. Provided that all bonds issued under the provisions of this Chapter shall be authorized and issued by the governing board of a city, town, or other unit of municipal government created under the laws of the State.

In connection with any project undertaken pursuant to this Chapter, a municipality shall have all of the rights and powers granted to a joint agency by subdivisions (12) and (13) of

G.S. 159B-11

.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law to the contrary, any contracts with respect to the sale or purchase of capacity, output, power or energy from a project may extend for a period not exceeding 50 years from the date a project is estimated to be placed in normal continuous operation; and the execution and effectiveness thereof shall not be subject to any authorizations or approvals by the State or any agency, commission or instrumentality or political subdivision thereof except as in this Chapter specifically required and provided.

History.

1975, c. 186, s. 1; 1983, c. 574, ss. 2-2.6.

§ 159B-5.1.
Joint ownership with other public or private entities engaged in generation, transmission or distribution of electric power for resale.

Municipalities and joint agencies may jointly or severally own, operate and maintain projects with any person, firm, association or corporation, public or private, engaged in the generation, transmission or distribution of electric power and energy for resale within this State or any state contiguous to this State. Any municipality or joint agency shall have for such purposes all powers conferred upon them by the provisions of this Chapter including the power to issue revenue bonds pursuant to the provisions of this Chapter to finance its share of the cost of any such project. The definitions and all other terms and provisions of this Chapter shall be construed so as to include such undivided ownership interest in order to fully effectuate the power and authority conferred by the foregoing provisions of this section.

History.

1977, c. 708, s. 3.

§ 159B-6.
Sale of capacity and output by a municipality.

Capacity or output derived by a municipality from its ownership share of a project not then required by such municipality for its own use and for the use of its consumers may be sold or exchanged by such municipality, for such consideration and for such period and upon such other terms and conditions as may be determined by the parties, to any municipality owning electric distribution facilities in this State, to any electric membership corporation or public utility authorized to do business in this State, or to any state, federal or municipal agency which owns electric generation, transmission or distribution facilities. Provided, however, that the foregoing limitations shall not apply to the temporary sale of excess capacity and energy without the State in cases of emergency or when required to fulfill obligations under any pooling or reserve-sharing agreements reasonably related to its needs for power and energy. Provided further, however, that sales of excess capacity or output of a project to electric membership corporations, public utilities, and other persons the interest on whose securities and other obligations is not exempt from taxation by the federal government shall not be made in such amounts, for such periods of time, and under such terms and conditions as will cause the interest on bonds issued to finance the cost of a project to become taxable by the federal government.

History.

1975, c. 186, s. 1.

§ 159B-7.
Licenses, permits, certificates and approvals.

Municipalities proposing to jointly plan, finance, develop, own and operate a project are hereby authorized, either jointly or separately, to apply to the appropriate agencies of the State, the United States, or any state thereof, and to any other proper agency for such licenses, permits, certificates or approvals as may be necessary, and to construct, maintain and operate projects in accordance with such licenses, permits, certificates or approvals and to obtain, hold and use such licenses, permits, certificates and approvals in the same manner as any other operating unit of any other person.

History.

1975, c. 186, s. 1.

§ 159B-8.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1995, c. 412, s. 4.

§ 159B-9.
Creation of a joint agency; board of commissioners.

The governing boards of two or more municipalities may by resolution or ordinance determine that it is in the best interests of the municipalities in accomplishing the purposes of this Chapter to create a joint agency as prescribed herein for the purpose of undertaking the planning, financing, development, acquisition, construction, reconstruction, improvement, enlargement, betterment, operation and maintenance of a project or projects as an alternative or supplemental method of obtaining the benefits and assuming the responsibilities of ownership in a project.In determining whether or not creation of a joint agency for such purpose is in the best interests of the municipalities, the governing boards shall take into consideration, but shall not be limited to, the following:

Whether or not a separate entity may be able to finance the cost of projects in a more efficient and economical manner;

Whether or not better financial market acceptance may result if one entity is responsible for issuing all of the bonds required for a project or projects in a timely and orderly manner and with a uniform credit rating instead of multiple entities issuing separate issues of bonds;

Whether or not savings and other advantages may be obtained by providing a separate entity responsible for the acquisition, construction, ownership and operation of a project or projects; and

Whether or not the existence of such a separate entity will foster the continuation of joint planning and undertaking of projects, and the resulting economies and efficiencies to be derived from such joint planning and undertaking.If each governing board shall determine that it is in the best interest of the municipality to create a joint agency to provide power and energy to the municipality as provided in this Chapter, each shall adopt a resolution or ordinance so finding (which need not prescribe in detail the basis for the determination), and which shall set forth the names of the municipalities which are proposed to be initial members of the joint agency. The governing board of the municipality shall thereupon by ordinance or resolution appoint one commissioner of the joint agency who may, at the discretion of the governing board, be an officer or employee of the municipality.Any two or more commissioners so named may file with the Secretary of State an application signed by them setting forth (i) the names of all the proposed member municipalities; (ii) the name and official residence of each of the commissioners so far as known to them; (iii) a certified copy of the appointment evidencing their right to office; (iv) a statement that each governing board of each respective municipality appointing a commissioner has made the aforesaid determination; (v) the desire that a joint agency be organized as a public body and a body corporate and politic under this Chapter; and (vi) the name which is proposed for the joint agency.The application shall be subscribed and sworn to by such commissioners before an officer or officers authorized by the laws of the State to administer and certify oaths.The Secretary of State shall examine the application and, if he finds that the name proposed for the joint agency is not identical with that of any other corporation of this State or of any agency or instrumentality thereof, or so nearly similar as to lead to confusion and uncertainty, he shall receive and file it and shall record it in an appropriate book of record in his office.When the application has been made, filed and recorded as herein provided, the joint agency shall constitute a public body and a body corporate and politic under the name proposed in the application. The Secretary of State shall make and issue to the commissioners executing the application a certificate of incorporation pursuant to this Chapter under the seal of the State, and shall record the same with the application. The certificate shall set forth the names of the member municipalities.In any suit, action or proceeding involving the validity or enforcement of, or relating to, any contract of the joint agency, the joint agency, in the absence of establishing fraud in the premises, shall be conclusively deemed to have been established in accordance with the provisions of this Chapter upon proof of the issuance of the aforesaid certificate by the Secretary of State. A copy of such certificate, duly certified by the Secretary of State, shall be admissible in evidence in any such suit, action or proceeding, and shall be conclusive proof of the filing and contents thereof.Notice of the issuance of such certificate shall be given to all of the proposed member municipalities by the Secretary of State. If a commissioner of any such municipality has not signed the application to the Secretary of State and such municipality does not notify the Secretary of State of the appointment of a commissioner within 40 days after receipt of such notice, such municipality shall be deemed to have elected not to be a member of the joint agency. As soon as practicable after the expiration of such 40-day period, the Secretary of State shall issue a new certificate of incorporation, if necessary, setting forth the names of those municipalities which have elected to become members of the joint agency. The failure of any proposed member to become a member shall not affect the validity of the corporate existence of the joint agency.

After the creation of a joint agency, any other municipality may become a member thereof upon application to such joint agency after the adoption of a resolution or ordinance by the governing board of the municipality setting forth the determination and finding prescribed in paragraph (a) of this

G.S. 159B-9

, and authorizing said municipality to participate, and with the unanimous consent of the members of the joint agency evidenced by the resolutions of their respective governing bodies. Any municipality may withdraw from a joint agency, provided, however, that all contractual rights acquired and obligations incurred while a municipality was a member shall remain in full force and effect.

The powers of a joint agency shall be exercised by or under the authority of, and the business and affairs of a joint agency shall be managed under the direction of, its board of commissioners. However, all or a portion of those powers and the management of all or any part of the business and affairs of a joint agency may be exercised by an executive committee created pursuant to

G.S. 159B-10

. The board of commissioners shall consist of commissioners appointed by the respective governing boards of the municipalities which are members of the joint agency. Each commissioner shall have not less than one vote and may have in addition thereto such additional votes as the governing boards of a majority of the municipalities which are members of the agency shall determine. Each commissioner shall serve at the pleasure of the governing board by which the commissioner was appointed. Each appointed commissioner before entering upon his duties shall take and subscribe to an oath before some person authorized by law to administer oaths to execute the duties of his office faithfully and impartially, and a record of each such oath shall be filed with the governing board of the appointing municipality and spread upon its minutes. The governing board of each of the municipalities may appoint up to two alternate commissioners to act in lieu of its appointed commissioner when the appointed commissioner is unable for any reason to attend meetings of the board of commissioners or any committee thereof, and the governing board shall designate them as first or second alternate commissioner. Each alternate commissioner shall serve at the pleasure of the governing body by which that commissioner was appointed and shall take, subscribe to and file an oath in the same manner as prescribed for regularly appointed commissioners. Such alternate commissioner when acting in lieu of the regularly appointed commissioner shall be deemed to be the commissioner of such municipality, and shall have the rights, powers and authority of the regularly appointed commissioner, including any committee function of said commissioner, other than such commissioner’s position as an officer pursuant to paragraph (d) of this

G.S. 159B-9

. A certificate entered into the minutes of the board of commissioners of a joint agency by the clerk or other custodian of the minutes and records of the governing body of a municipality, appointing commissioners and alternate commissioners and reciting their appointments, shall constitute conclusive evidence of their appointment. The offices of commissioner, alternate commissioner, or officer of a joint agency are hereby declared to be offices which may be held by the holders of any office, place of trust or profit in addition to and concurrently with those offices permitted by

G.S. 128-1.1

and other offices permitted by other General Statute.

The board of commissioners of the joint agency shall annually elect one of the commissioners as chairman, another as vice-chairman, and another person or persons, who may but need not be commissioners, as treasurer, secretary, and, if desired, assistant secretary and assistant treasurer. The office of treasurer or assistant treasurer may be held by the secretary or assistant secretary. The board of commissioners may also appoint such additional officers as it deems necessary. The secretary or any assistant secretary of the joint agency shall keep a record of the proceedings of the joint agency, and the secretary shall be the custodian of all records, books, documents and papers filed with the joint agency, the minute book or journal of the joint agency and its official seal. Either the secretary or the assistant secretary of the joint agency may cause copies to be made of all minutes and other records and documents of the joint agency and may give certificates under the official seal of the joint agency to the effect that such copies are true copies, and all persons dealing with the joint agency may rely upon such certificates.

A majority of the commissioners of a joint agency then in office shall constitute a quorum. A vacancy in the board of commissioners of the joint agency shall not impair the right of a quorum to exercise all the rights and perform all the duties of the joint agency. Any action taken by the joint agency under the provisions of this Chapter may be authorized by resolution at any regular or special meeting, and each such resolution may take effect immediately and need not be published or posted. A majority of the votes which the commissioners present are entitled to cast shall be necessary and sufficient to take any action or to pass any resolution, provided that such commissioners present are entitled to cast a majority of the votes of all commissioners of the board.

No commissioner of a joint agency shall receive any compensation for the performance of his duties hereunder, provided, however, that each commissioner may be paid his necessary expenses incurred while engaged in the performance of such duties.

History.

1975, c. 186, s. 1; 1977, c. 385, ss. 3, 4; 1979, c. 102; 1983, c. 574, s. 3; 1985, c. 243, s. 1; 1995, c. 412, s. 5.

§ 159B-10.
Executive committee, composition; powers and duties; terms.

The board of commissioners of a joint agency may create an executive committee by resolution. The board may provide for the composition and terms of office of, and the method of filling vacancies on, the executive committee. The executive committee may include representatives of the joint agency, representatives of any other joint agency, and any other persons. The executive committee of a joint agency may simultaneously act as the executive committee of any other joint agency or agencies, or joint municipal assistance agency or agencies, if so provided by all such entities, and also may simultaneously act as the sole governing board of any joint municipal assistance agency created by two or more joint agencies pursuant to

G.S. 159B-45

if so provided by all such joint agencies. An executive committee acting as the sole governing board of a joint municipal assistance agency shall not be subject to the limitations on the powers and authority of executive committees set forth in subsection (b) of this section.

Except as limited by resolution of the board of commissioners creating an executive committee and except as otherwise provided in this subsection, an executive committee shall have and shall exercise all of the powers and authority of the board of commissioners creating the executive committee. However, the executive committee shall not have the power or authority to (i) amend any resolution of the board of commissioners of the joint agency relating to the creation of the executive committee or providing for its powers or authority; or (ii) adopt or amend a budget. Any rate for a joint agency adopted by an executive committee may be rejected, within 30 days following the adoption of the rate, by a vote of two-thirds in number of the commissioners representing the joint agency members affected by the rate. In the event that any rate is rejected in this manner, the executive committee shall, within 10 days following the action on the part of the commissioners, adopt a second rate for that joint agency, which may be the same rate as previously adopted. This second rate may be rejected, within 10 days following the adoption of the rate, by a vote of two-thirds in number of the commissioners representing the joint agency members affected by the rate. If a second rate adopted by the executive committee is rejected in this manner, the board of commissioners of the affected joint agency shall, acting by weighted vote, adopt a rate for the joint agency which is sufficient at least to comply with the requirements of

G.S. 159B-17(b)

. No such rate adopted by the executive committee shall become effective so long as it is subject to rejection by commissioners of a joint agency as provided for in this subsection. However, if the executive committee determines that the establishment of a rate is required within 50 days to enable a joint agency to satisfy the requirements of

G.S. 159B-17(b)

, the rate adopted by the executive committee shall be effective until changed by the executive committee or board of commissioners in accordance with this subsection.

Each member of the executive committee shall have one vote and shall serve at the pleasure of the governing board by which the member was appointed. Before performing duties as a member, each member shall take and subscribe to an oath before some person authorized by law to administer oaths to execute the duties of the office faithfully and impartially, and a record of each oath shall be filed with the governing board appointing the member and spread upon its minutes. The office of a member of an executive committee may be held by the holders of any office, place of trust or profit in addition to and concurrently with those offices permitted by

G.S. 128-1.1

and other offices permitted by law.

The executive committee shall annually elect from its membership a chair and vice-chair, and shall elect another person or persons, who need not be members, to serve as secretary and, if desired, assistant secretary. The secretary or any assistant secretary of the executive committee shall keep a record of the proceedings of the executive committee, and the secretary shall be the custodian of all records, books, documents, and papers filed with the executive committee, as well as the minute book or journal of the executive committee. Either the secretary or the assistant secretary of the executive committee may cause copies to be made of all minutes and other records and documents of the executive committee and may give certificates of the executive committee to the effect that the copies are true copies, and all persons dealing with the executive committee may rely upon those certificates.

A majority of the members of an executive committee then serving shall constitute a quorum. A vacancy on the executive committee shall not impair the right of a quorum to exercise all the rights and perform all the duties of the executive committee. Any action taken by the executive committee under the provisions of this Chapter may be authorized by resolution at any regular or special meeting, and each such resolution may take effect immediately and need not be published or posted. A vote of the majority of the members present shall be necessary and sufficient to take any action or to pass any resolution, provided that those members present are entitled to cast a majority of the votes of all members of the executive committee.

Members of the executive committee, and of any subcommittee created by the executive committee, may receive compensation and be paid expenses for the performance of their duties as determined by the board or boards of commissioners creating that executive committee. However, for any member of an executive committee who is an employee of a municipality, a payment in lieu of any compensation shall be made to the municipality for distribution to the executive committee member in the manner and amount, if any, it deems appropriate. An executive committee for more than one entity may be referred to as a board of directors of any or each of those entities.

History.

1975, c. 186, s. 1; 1977, c. 385, s. 5; 1995, c. 412, s. 6.